Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-510
State Fire Marshal; investigations; witnesses; disobedience of subpoena or contumacy; penalty.

Disobedience of any subpoena in such proceedings, or contumacy of a witness, may, upon application of the State Fire Marshal to the district court of the county in which the offense was committed, be punished by the district court in the same manner as if the proceedings were pending in such court.

Laws 1925, c. 183, § 9, p. 483;

C.S.1929, § 81-5509;

R.S.1943, § 81-510.